California statutes. Civil Code
(2) The contract shall be available for inspection by the buyer prior to purchase and either the contract, or a brochure which specifically describes the terms, conditions, and exclusions of the contract, and the provisions of this section relating to contract delivery, cancellation, and refund, shall be delivered to the buyer at or before the time of purchase of the contract. Within 60 days after the date of purchase, the contract itself shall be delivered to the buyer. If a service contract for a home appliance or a home electronic product is sold by means of a telephone solicitation, the seller may elect to satisfy the requirements of this paragraph by mailing or delivering the contract to the buyer not later than 30 days after the date of the sale of the contract.

(3) The contract is applicable only to items,
 costs, and time periods not covered by the express warranty. However, a service contract may run concurrently with or overlap an express warranty if (A) the contract covers items or costs not covered by the express warranty or (B) the contract provides relief to the purchaser not available under the express warranty, such as automatic replacement of a product where the express warranty only provides for repair.

(4) The contract shall be cancelable by the purchaser under the following conditions:

(A) Unless the contract provides for a longer period, within the first 60 days after receipt of the contract, or with respect to a contract covering a used motor vehicle without manufacturer warranties, a home appliance, or a home electronic product, within the first 30 days after receipt of the contract, the full amount paid shall be refunded by the seller to the purchaser if the
 purchaser provides a written notice of cancellation to the person specified in the contract, and if no claims have been made against the contract. If a claim has been made against the contract either within the first 60 days after receipt of the contract, or with respect to a used motor vehicle without manufacturer warranties, home appliance, or home electronic product, within the first 30 days after receipt of the contract, a pro rata refund, based on either elapsed time or an objective measure of use, such as mileage or the retail value of any service performed, at the seller’s option as indicated in the contract, or for a vehicle service contract at the obligor’s option as determined at the time of cancellation, shall be made by the seller to the purchaser if the purchaser provides a written notice of cancellation to the person specified in the contract.

(B) Unless the contract provides for a longer period for obtaining a full refund, after
 the first 60 days after receipt of the contract, or with respect to a contract covering a used motor vehicle without manufacturer warranties, a home appliance, or a home electronic product, after the first 30 days after the receipt of the contract, a pro rata refund, based on either elapsed time or an objective measure of use, such as mileage or the retail value of any service performed, at the seller’s option as indicated in the contract, or for a vehicle service contract at the obligor’s option as determined at the time of cancellation, shall be made by the seller to the purchaser if the purchaser provides a written notice of cancellation to the person specified in the contract. In addition, the seller may assess a cancellation or administrative fee, not to exceed 10 percent of the price of the service contract or twenty-five dollars ($25), whichever is less.

(C) If the purchase of the service contract was financed, the seller may make the
 refund payable to the purchaser, the assignee, or lender of record, or both.

(b) Nothing in this section shall apply to a home protection plan that is issued by a home protection company which is subject to Part 7 (commencing with Section 12740) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code.

(c) If any provision of this section conflicts with any provision of Part 8 (commencing with Section 12800) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, the provision of the Insurance Code shall apply instead of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 543, Sec. 7.   (AB 2111)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.45.

(a) A retailer that sells a service contract pursuant to Section 1794.4 shall do either of the following during the period that the service contract is in effect:

(1) Maintain contract information that includes a description of the terms and conditions of the service contract, and provide that information to the purchaser of the service contract or other beneficiary upon request.

(2) Upon request from the purchaser of the service contract or other beneficiary, obtain a copy of the service contract, and provide that copy to the requester within 10 business days after receiving the request.

(b) This section shall not apply to a vehicle service contract, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12800 of the Insurance Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 74, Sec. 1.   (AB 63)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1794.5.

The provisions of this chapter shall not preclude a manufacturer making express warranties from suggesting methods of effecting service and repair, in accordance with the terms and conditions of the express warranties, other than those required by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.

If express warranties are made by persons other than the manufacturer of the goods, the obligation of the person making such warranties shall be the same as that imposed on the manfacturer under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1333.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.1.

This chapter shall apply to any equipment or mechanical, electrical, or thermal component of a system designed to heat, cool, or otherwise condition air, but, with that exception, shall not apply to the system as a whole where such a system becomes a fixed part of a structure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.4.

For the purposes of this chapter only, the following rules apply to leases of both new and used consumer goods:

(a) If express warranties are regularly furnished to purchasers of substantially the same kind of goods, (1) those warranties will be deemed to apply to the leased goods and (2) the lessor and lessee shall each be deemed to be the first purchaser of the goods for the purpose of any warranty provision limiting warranty benefits to the original purchaser.

(b) The lessee of goods has the same rights under this
 chapter against the manufacturer and any person making express warranties that the lessee would have had under this chapter if the goods had been purchased by the lessee, and the manufacturer and any person making express warranties have the same duties and obligations under this chapter with respect to the goods that such manufacturer and other person would have had under this chapter if the goods had been sold to the lessee.

(c) If a lessor leases goods to a lessee from the lessor’s inventory, the lessee has the same rights under this chapter against the lessor that the lessee would have had if the goods had been purchased by the lessee, and the lessor has the same duties and obligations under this chapter with respect to the goods that the lessor would have had under this chapter if the goods had been sold to the lessee. For purposes of this section, “inventory” shall include both goods in the lessor’s possession prior to negotiation of the
 lease and goods ordered from another party in order to lease those goods to the lessee where the lessor is a dealer in goods of that type.

(d) If a lessor leases goods to a lessee which the lessor acquires other than from the lessor’s inventory, the lessee has the same rights under this chapter against the seller of the goods to the lessor that the lessee would have had under this chapter if the goods had been purchased by the lessee from the seller, and the seller of the goods to the lessor has the same duties and obligations under this chapter with respect to the goods that the seller would have had under this chapter if the goods had been purchased by the lessee from the seller.

(e) A lessor who re-leases goods to a new lessee and does not retake possession of the goods prior to consummation of the re-lease may, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1793, disclaim as to
 that lessee any and all warranties created by this chapter by conspicuously disclosing in the lease that these warranties are disclaimed.

(f) A lessor who has obligations to the lessee with relation to warranties in connection with a lease of goods and the seller of goods to a lessor have the same rights and remedies against the manufacturer and any person making express warranties that a seller of the goods would have had if the seller had sold the goods to the lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1169, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1791 defining consumer goods to mean “new” goods, the obligation of a distributor or retail seller of used consumer goods in a sale in which an express warranty is given shall be the same as that imposed on manufacturers under this chapter except:

(a) It shall be the obligation of the distributor or retail seller making express warranties with respect to used consumer goods (and not the original manufacturer, distributor, or retail seller making express warranties with respect to such goods when new) to maintain sufficient
 service and repair facilities within this state to carry out the terms of such express warranties.

(b) The provisions of Section 1793.5 shall not apply to the sale of used consumer goods sold in this state.

(c) The duration of the implied warranty of merchantability and where present the implied warranty of fitness with respect to used consumer goods sold in this state, where the sale is accompanied by an express warranty, shall be coextensive in duration with an express warranty which accompanies the consumer goods, provided the duration of the express warranty is reasonable, but in no event shall such implied warranties have a duration of less than 30 days nor more than three months following the sale of used consumer goods to a retail buyer. Where no duration for an express warranty is stated with respect to such goods, or parts thereof, the duration of the implied warranties
 shall be the maximum period prescribed above.

(d) The obligation of the distributor or retail seller who makes express warranties with respect to used goods that are sold in this state, shall extend to the sale of all such used goods, regardless of when such goods may have been manufactured.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.51.

(a) No buy-here-pay-here dealer, as that term is defined in Section 241 of the Vehicle Code, shall sell or lease a used vehicle, as defined in Section 665 of the Vehicle Code, at retail price without giving the buyer or lessee a written warranty that shall have a minimum duration of at least 30 days from the date of delivery or when the odometer has registered 1,000 miles from what is shown on the contract, whichever occurs first.

(b) The written warranty shall provide that if the buyer or lessee notifies the buy-here-pay-here dealer that the vehicle does not conform to the written warranty, the buy-here-pay-here dealer shall either repair the vehicle to conform to the written warranty, reimburse the buyer or lessee for the reasonable cost of repairs, or cancel the sale or lease contract and provide the buyer or lessee with a full refund, less a reasonable amount for any damage sustained by the vehicle after the sale or lease, excepting damage caused by any nonconformity with the written warranty.

(c) The written warranty shall provide that the buy-here-pay-here dealer shall pay 100 percent of the cost of labor and parts for any repairs pursuant to the warranty, and may not charge the buyer or lessee for the cost of repairs or for inspecting the vehicle, tearing down the engine or transmission or other part,
 or for any deductible. Any person performing repairs pursuant to this subdivision shall comply with the requirements of an automotive repair dealer pursuant to Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(d) The buy-here-pay-here dealer or its agent may elect to refund the buyer or lessee a full refund, less a reasonable amount for any damage sustained by the vehicle after the sale or lease, excepting damage caused by any nonconformity with the written warranty, rather than performing a repair. In the event that the buy-here-pay-here dealer cancels the sale or lease, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The buy-here-pay-here dealer shall give written notice to the buyer or lessee of the election to cancel the sale or lease by personal delivery or first-class mail.

(2) The buyer or lessee shall return the vehicle in substantially the same condition as when it was delivered by the buy-here-pay-here dealer, reasonable wear and tear and any nonconformity with the written warranty excepted.

(3) The buy-here-pay-here dealer shall provide the buyer or lessee with a receipt stating all of the following:

(A) The date the vehicle was returned to the buy-here-pay-here dealer.

(B) The vehicle identification number.

(C) The make, year, and model of the vehicle.

(D) The odometer reading at the time that the vehicle was returned to the buy-here-pay-here dealer.

(E) A statement that the
 buy-here-pay-here dealer has canceled the sale or lease.

(F) The amount of the buyer’s or lessee’s refund.

(4) The buy-here-pay-here dealer shall not treat the return of the vehicle pursuant to the contract cancellation provisions of this subdivision as a repossession.

(5) The buyer or lessee shall execute the documents necessary to transfer any interest in the vehicle to the buy-here-pay-here dealer or to remove the buyer or lessee from any registration or title documents.

(6) The buy-here-pay-here dealer shall refund to the buyer or lessee, no later than the day after the day on which the buyer or lessee returns the vehicle and the notice of election to cancel is given to the buyer or lessee, all amounts paid under the sale or lease agreement, less a
 reasonable amount for property damage sustained by the vehicle after the sale or lease, excepting damage caused by any nonconformity with the warranty.

(e) The written warranty shall cover at least the following components:

(1) Engine, including all internally lubricated parts.

(2) Transmission and transaxle.

(3) Front and rear wheel drive components.

(4) Engine cooling system.

(5) Alternator, generator, starter, and ignition system, not including the battery.

(6) Braking system.

(7) Front and rear
 suspension systems.

(8) Steering system and components.

(9) Seatbelts.

(10) Inflatable restraint systems installed on the vehicle as originally manufactured.

(11) Catalytic converter and other emissions components necessary for the vehicle to pass a California emissions test.

(12) Heater.

(13) Seals and gaskets on components described in this subdivision.

(14) Electrical, electronic, and computer components, to the extent that those components substantially affect the functionality of other components described in this subdivision.

(f) Any Used Car Buyer’s Guide displayed on a vehicle offered for sale or lease by a buy-here-pay-here dealer shall list each of the above systems and components and shall specify that the buy-here-pay-here dealer will pay 100 percent of the cost of parts and labor for repairs covered by the warranty.

(g) The buy-here-pay-here dealer shall make the repair or provide a refund notwithstanding the fact that the warranty period has expired if the buyer or lessee notified the buy-here-pay-here dealer of the failure of a covered system or part within the warranty period.

(h) This section shall not apply to any defect or nonconformity caused by the unauthorized or unreasonable use of the vehicle following the sale, or to any property damage not to the vehicle arising out of the failure of a covered part.

(i) In any proceeding in which the exclusion of coverage permitted by subdivision (h) or the deduction allowed by paragraph (6) of subdivision (d) is an issue, the buy-here-pay-here dealer shall have the burden of proof.

(j) A buy-here-pay-here dealer shall not sell or lease any vehicle unless the vehicle meets all of the equipment requirements of Division 12 (commencing with Section 24000) of the Vehicle Code.

(k) Any agreement between a buy-here-pay-here dealer and a buyer or lessee that disclaims, limits, or waives the rights set forth in this section shall be void as contrary to public policy.

(l) If a buy-here-pay-here dealer fails to give a buyer a written warranty pursuant to this section, the buy-here-pay-here dealer shall be deemed to have
 provided the warranty as a matter of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.   (AB 1447)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.6.

(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) warranty period relating to an implied or express warranty accompanying a sale or consignment for sale of consumer goods selling for fifty dollars ($50) or more shall automatically be tolled for the period from the date upon which the buyer either (1) delivers nonconforming goods to the manufacturer or seller for warranty repairs or
 service or (2), pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1793.2 or Section 1793.22, notifies the manufacturer or seller of the nonconformity of the goods up to, and including, the date upon which (1) the repaired or serviced goods are delivered to the buyer, (2) the buyer is notified the goods are repaired or serviced and are available for the buyer’s possession or (3) the buyer is notified that repairs or service is completed, if repairs or service is made at the buyer’s residence.

(2) With respect to hearing aids, the warranty period shall resume on the date upon which (1) the repaired or serviced hearing aid is delivered to the buyer or (2) five days after the buyer is notified the hearing aid is repaired or serviced and is available for the buyer’s possession, whichever is earlier.

(b) Notwithstanding the date or conditions set for the expiration of the warranty period, such
 warranty period shall not be deemed expired if either or both of the following situations occur: (1) after the buyer has satisfied the requirements of subdivision (a), the warranty repairs or service has not been performed due to delays caused by circumstances beyond the control of the buyer or (2) the warranty repairs or service performed upon the nonconforming goods did not remedy the nonconformity for which such repairs or service was performed and the buyer notified the manufacturer or seller of this failure within 60 days after the repairs or service was completed. When the warranty repairs or service has been performed so as to remedy the nonconformity, the warranty period shall expire in accordance with its terms, including any extension to the warranty period for warranty repairs or service.

(c) For purposes of this section only, “manufacturer” includes the manufacturer’s service or repair facility.

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), every manufacturer or seller of consumer goods selling for fifty dollars ($50) or more shall provide a receipt to the buyer showing the date of purchase. Every manufacturer or seller performing warranty repairs or service on the goods shall provide to the buyer a work order or receipt with the date of return and either the date the buyer was notified that the goods were repaired or serviced or, where applicable, the date the goods were shipped or delivered to the buyer.

(2) With respect to hearing aids, the seller, after receiving the hearing aid for warranty repairs or service, shall also provide at the time of delivery to the buyer a work order or receipt with the following: (1) the date the warranty period resumes and (2) the revised expiration date of the warranty, as adjusted to reflect the suspension of the
 warranty period provided under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 226, Sec. 2.   (SB 1326)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.7.

Whenever a warranty, express or implied, is tolled pursuant to Section 1795.6 as a result of repairs or service performed by any retail seller, the warranty shall be extended with regard to the liability of the manufacturer to a retail seller pursuant to law. In such event, the manufacturer shall be liable in accordance with the provisions of Section 1793.5 for the period that an express warranty has been extended by virtue of Section 1795.6 to every retail seller who incurs obligations in giving effect to such express warranty. The manufacturer shall also be liable to every retail seller for the period that an implied warranty has been extended by virtue of Section
 1795.6, in the same manner as he would be liable under Section 1793.5 for an express warranty. If a manufacturer provides for warranty repairs and service through its own service and repair facilities and through independent repair facilities in the state, its exclusive liability pursuant to this section shall be to such facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 844.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.8.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this chapter shall apply to a purchase in the United States of a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 1793.22, with a manufacturer’s express warranty by a member of the Armed Forces regardless of in which state his or her motor vehicle is purchased or registered, if both of the following apply:

(a) The member of the Armed Forces purchases a motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (2) of
 subdivision (e) of Section 1793.22, with a manufacturer’s express warranty from a manufacturer who sells motor vehicles in this state or from an agent or representative of that manufacturer.

(b) The member of the Armed Forces was stationed in or a resident of this state at the time he or she purchased the motor vehicle or at the time he or she filed an action pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 151, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Motor Vehicle Warranty Adjustment Programs [1795.90. - 1795.93.]

1795.90.

For purposes of this chapter:

(a) “Consumer” means the purchaser, other than for purposes of resale, of a motor vehicle, a lessee of a motor vehicle, any person to whom the motor vehicle is transferred during the duration of an express warranty applicable to that motor vehicle, and any person entitled by the terms of the warranty to enforce the obligations of the warranty.

(b) “Manufacturer” means any person, firm, or corporation,
whether resident or nonresident, that manufactures or assembles motor vehicles for sale or distribution in this state. In the case of motor vehicles not manufactured in the United States, the term “manufacturer” shall also include any person, firm, or corporation that is engaged in the business of importing motor vehicles.

(c) “Dealer” means any person, firm, or corporation selling or agreeing to sell in this state one or more new motor vehicles under a retail agreement with a manufacturer, manufacturer branch, distributor, distributor branch, or agent of any of them.

(d) “Adjustment program” means any program or policy that expands or extends the consumer’s warranty beyond its stated limit or under which a manufacturer offers to pay for all or any part of the cost of repairing, or to reimburse consumers for all or any part of the cost of repairing, any condition that may
substantially affect vehicle durability, reliability, or performance, other than service provided under a safety or emission-related recall campaign. “Adjustment program” does not include ad hoc adjustments made by a manufacturer on a case-by-case basis.

(e) “Motor vehicle” means a motor vehicle, excluding motorcycles, motor homes, and off-road vehicles, which is registered in this state.

(f) “Lessee” means any person who leases a motor vehicle pursuant to a written lease which provides that the lessee is responsible for repairs to the motor vehicle.

(g) “Service bulletin” means any notice issued by a manufacturer and filed with the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration relating to vehicle durability, reliability, or performance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.91.

Dealers shall have the following duties:

(a) A dealer shall provide notice to prospective purchasers and lessees that provides information on how to get copies of service bulletins. This notice shall not be construed as an admission by the dealer or manufacturer of the existence or nonexistence of a vehicle defect.

The notice shall be deemed sufficient if posted in the showroom or other area conspicuous to motor vehicle purchasers and written in the following form:
FEDERAL LAW REQUIRES MANUFACTURERS TO FURNISH THE NATIONAL HIGHWAY TRAFFIC SAFETY ADMINISTRATION
 (NHTSA) WITH BULLETINS DESCRIBING ANY DEFECTS IN THEIR VEHICLES. THESE BULLETINS ARE NOT RECALLS.
YOU MAY OBTAIN COPIES OF THESE TECHNICAL SERVICE BULLETINS FROM THE NHTSA, THE MANUFACTURER (ASK YOUR DEALER FOR THE TOLL-FREE NUMBER), OR
CERTAIN CONSUMER
 PUBLICATIONS, WHICH PUBLISH THESE BULLETINS. SOME COMPANIES WILL SEND THEM TO YOU, FOR A FEE.
(b) A dealer shall disclose to a consumer seeking repairs for a particular condition at its repair shop, the principal terms and conditions of the manufacturer’s adjustment program covering the condition if the dealer has received a service bulletin concerning the adjustment program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 490, Sec. 1.   (AB 596)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.92.

Manufacturers shall have the following duties:

(a) A manufacturer shall, within 90 days of the adoption of an adjustment program, subject to priority for safety or emission-related recalls, notify by first-class mail all owners or lessees of motor vehicles eligible under the program of the condition giving rise to and the principal terms and conditions of the program.

(b) Copies of all notices mailed in accordance with subdivision
(a) shall be sent to the New Motor Vehicle Board within the Department of Motor Vehicles and made available for public inquiries.

(c) A manufacturer shall, within 30 days of the adoption of any new adjustment program, notify its dealers, in writing, of all the terms and conditions thereof.

(d) A manufacturer who establishes an adjustment program shall implement procedures to assure reimbursement of each consumer eligible under an adjustment program who incurs expenses for repair of a condition subject to the program prior to acquiring knowledge of the program. The reimbursement shall be consistent with the terms and conditions of the particular program. The manufacturer shall notify the consumer within 21 business days of receiving a claim for reimbursement whether the claim will be allowed or denied. If the claim is denied, the specific reasons for the denial shall be stated in
writing.

(e) Any consumer who, prior to acquiring knowledge of an adjustment program, incurs expenses for repair of a condition subject to the adjustment program may file a claim for reimbursement under subdivision (d). The claim shall be made in writing to the manufacturer within two years of the date of the consumer’s payment for repair of the condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1795.93.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to exclude, modify, or otherwise limit any other remedy provided by law to a consumer or lessee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Standards for Warranty Work [1796. - 1796.5.]

1796.

Any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship which engages in the business of installing new or used consumer goods, has a duty to the buyer to install them in a good and workmanlike manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

1796.5.

Any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship which engages in the business of providing service or repair to new or used consumer goods has a duty to the purchaser to perform those services in a good and workmanlike manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Mobilehome Warranties [1797. - 1797.7.]

1797.

All new mobilehomes and manufactured homes sold to a buyer shall be covered by the warranty set forth in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 730, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Contractor” means any person who is a general building contractor within the meaning of Section 7057 of the Business and Professions Code.

(b) “Dealer” means any person who is a dealer within the meaning of Section 18002.6 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) “Mobilehome” and “manufactured home” have the meanings, respectively, defined in
Sections 18007 and 18008 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Substantial defects in materials and workmanship” means defects objectively manifested by broken, ripped, cracked, stained, or missing parts or components, or workmanship resulting in improper function of materials, components, appliances, or systems as installed or manufactured by the contractor, dealer, or manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.2.

(a) The warranty provided for in this chapter shall apply to the manufacturer of the mobilehome or the manufactured home as well as to the contractor or dealer who sells the mobilehome or the manufactured home to the buyer. The warranty shall cover the electrical, plumbing, heating, cooling, fire safety, and structural systems, and all appliances of the mobilehome or manufactured home as installed or manufactured by the contractor, dealer, or manufacturer.

(b) Where a
manufacturer sells a mobilehome or manufactured home directly to a city, city and county, or other public agency pursuant to the exception established in Section 18015.7, the manufacturer shall be responsible for providing the warranty required by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.3.

The mobilehome/manufactured home warranty from the contractor, manufacturer, or dealer to the buyer shall be set forth in a separate written document that reprints all of the provisions of this chapter and shall be delivered to the buyer by the contractor or dealer at the time the contract of sale is signed, and shall contain, but is not limited to, the following terms:

(a) That the mobilehome or manufactured home is free from any substantial defects in materials or workmanship.

(b) That the contractor, manufacturer, or dealer or any or all of them shall take appropriate corrective action at the site of the mobilehome or manufactured home in instances of substantial defects in materials or workmanship which become evident within one year from the date of delivery of the mobilehome or manufactured home to the buyer, provided the buyer or his or her transferee gives written notice of those defects to the contractor, manufacturer, or dealer at their business address not later than one year and 10 days after date of delivery.

(c) That the manufacturer and the contractor or dealer shall be jointly and severally liable to the buyer for the fulfillment of the terms of warranty, and that the buyer may notify either one or both of the need for appropriate corrective action in instances of substantial defects in materials or workmanship.

(d) That the address and the phone number of where to mail or deliver written notices of defects shall be set forth in the document.

(e) That the one-year warranty period applies to the plumbing, heating, electrical, cooling, fire safety, and structural systems and all appliances of the mobilehome or manufactured home.

(f) That, while the manufacturers of any or all appliances may also issue their own warranties, the primary responsibility for appropriate corrective action under the warranty rests with the contractor or dealer and the manufacturer, and the buyer should report all complaints to the contractor or dealer and the manufacturer initially.

(g) That, if corrective action taken by the manufacturer or the contractor or dealer fails to eliminate a
substantial defect, then the material, system, appliance, or component shall be replaced in kind. As used in this subdivision, “replaced in kind” means (1) replacement with the identical material, system, appliance, or component, and, if not available (2) replacement with a comparable or better material, system, appliance, or component.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.4.

The warranty under this chapter shall be in addition to, and not in derogation of, all other rights and privileges which the buyer may have under any other law or instrument. The contractor, manufacturer, or dealer shall not require the buyer to waive his or her rights under this chapter, and any waiver of these rights shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be unenforceable and void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.5.

Every contractor or dealer shall display a copy of all of the warranty provisions required by this chapter. The copy of the warranty provisions required by this chapter shall be posted in each area where purchase orders and conditional sales contracts are written.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.6.

Manufacturers, contractors, and dealers shall keep records of all actions taken pursuant to this chapter, including all correspondence to or from the buyer for a period of three years from the date of delivery.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.7.

The contractor, dealer, or manufacturer shall complete warranty service to correct all substantial defects within 90 days of receiving the buyer’s written notice specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1797.3, unless there are circumstances which are beyond the control of the contractor, dealer, or manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 458, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Grey Market Goods [1797.8. - 1797.86.]

1797.8.

(a) As used in this chapter, the term “grey market goods” means consumer goods bearing a trademark and normally accompanied by an express written warranty valid in the United States of America which are imported into the United States through channels other than the manufacturer’s authorized United States distributor and which are not accompanied by the manufacturer’s express written warranty valid in the United States.

(b) As used in this chapter, the term “sale” includes a lease of more than four months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.81.

(a) Every retail seller who offers grey market goods for sale shall post a conspicuous sign at the product’s point of display and affix to the product or its package a conspicuous ticket, label, or tag disclosing any or all of the following, whichever is applicable:

(1) The item is not covered by a manufacturer’s express written warranty valid in the United States (however, any implied warranty provided by law still exists).

(2) The item is not compatible with United States electrical currents.

(3) The item is not compatible with United States broadcast frequencies.

(4) Replacement parts are not available through the manufacturer’s United States distributors.

(5) Compatible accessories are not available through the manufacturer’s United States distributors.

(6) The item is not accompanied by instructions in English.

(7) The item is not eligible for a manufacturer’s rebate.

(8) Any other incompatibility or nonconformity with relevant domestic standards known to the seller.

(b) The disclosure described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not be
required to be made by a retail seller with respect to grey market goods that are accompanied by an express written warranty provided by the retail seller, provided that each of the following conditions is satisfied:

(1) The protections and other benefits that are provided to the buyer by the express written warranty provided by the retail seller are equal to or better than the protections and other benefits that are provided to buyers in the United States of America by the manufacturer’s express written warranty that normally accompanies the goods.

(2) The express written warranty conforms to the requirements of the Song-Beverly Consumer Warranty Act, (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1790)), including, but not limited to, the warranty disclosure standards specified in Section 1793.1, and the standards applicable to service and repair facilities specified in Section 1793.2.

(3) The retail seller has posted a conspicuous sign at the product’s point of sale or display, or has affixed to the product or its package a conspicuous ticket, label, or tag that informs prospective buyers that copies of all of the warranties applicable to the products offered for sale by the retail seller are available to prospective buyers for inspection upon request.

(4) The retail seller has complied with the provisions on presale availability of written warranties set forth in the regulations of the Federal Trade Commission adopted pursuant to the federal Magnuson-Moss Warranty-Federal Trade Commission Improvement Act (see 15 U.S.C.A. Sec. 2302(b)(1)(A) and 16 C.F.R. 702.1 et seq.).

(c) Nothing in subdivision (b) shall affect the obligations of a retail seller to make the disclosures, if any, required by any
other paragraph of subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.82.

Every retail dealer who offers for sale grey market goods shall be required to disclose in any advertisement of those goods the disclosures required by Section 1797.81. The disclosure shall be made in a type of conspicuous size.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.83.

In making the disclosures prescribed by this chapter, the retail seller may use reasonably equivalent language if necessary or appropriate to achieve a clearer, or more accurate, disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1497, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1797.84.
